zh-TW: 遙控車比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; 其他
zh-CN: 遥控车辆比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; 其他
fr: Échelle des véhicules RC: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Autre
tr: RC araç ölçeği: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Diğer
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomos transporto priemonės mastelis: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Kita
es: Escala del vehículo a control remoto: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Otro
th: รถบังคับวิทยุขนาดจำลอง: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; อื่นๆ
it: Scala del veicolo RC: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Altro
de: Maßstab des RC-Fahrzeugs: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Sonstige
nb: Skala for radiostyrt kjøretøy: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Annet
vi: Tỷ lệ của xe điều khiển từ xa: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Khác
ja: RC車両スケール: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; その他
sk-SK: Mierka pretekárskeho autíčka: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Iné
fi: Radio-ohjattavan ajoneuvon mittakaava: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Muu
en: RC vehicle scale: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Other
pt-PT: Escala do veículo radiocontrolado: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Outro
hu: RC jármű léptéke: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Egyéb
pt-BR: Veículo com controle remoto, escala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Outros
ko: RC 차량 스케일: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; 기타
ro-RO: Scară a vehiculului RC: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Altele
pl: Skala zdalnego sterowanego pojazdu: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Inne
bg-BG: Мащаб на RC превозно средство: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Други
sl-SI: Merilo radijsko vodenega vozila: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Drugo
cs: Měřítko RC vozidla: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Ostatní
hr-HR: Mjerilo RC vozila: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Ostalo
el: Κλίμακα οχήματος RC: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Άλλο
nl: Schaal van RC-voertuig: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Overig
ru: Масштаб радиоуправляемого транспортного средства: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Другое
da: Skala for RC-køretøj: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Andet
sv: Skala för radiostyrd fordon: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:28; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:5; 1:6; 1:64; 1:7; 1:8; 1:9; Övrigt